Wyoming, session 2026, HB0020.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 36-4-124 is created to read:

36-4-124. Nonmotorized recreational trail permits;
fees.

HB0020

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0115
(a) As used in this section, "bicycle" means as
defined by W.S. 31-5-102(a)(iii) and also includes electric
bicycles as defined by rule of the department of state
parks and cultural resources.

(b) The department of state parks and cultural
resources may designate trails located within the
boundaries of state parks, historic sites or recreation
areas that are under the control of the department for
which a bicycle user shall be required to display or
possess a valid nonmotorized recreational trail permit.

(c) The following shall apply to permits issued under
this section:

(i) The department may require a nonmotorized
trail permit for the use of bicycles on trails designated
by rule in accordance with this section;

(ii) The department may establish the following
fees for nonmotorized recreational trail permits:

HB0020

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0115
(A) An annual fee of not more than ten
dollars ($10.00) for Wyoming residents and not more than
twenty dollars ($20.00) for nonresidents;

(B) A daily fee of not more than five
dollars ($5.00) for any user, regardless of residency.

(iii) The department may use selling agents as
provided by W.S. 36-4-123 to sell nonmotorized recreational
trail permits;

(iv) A person under eighteen (18) years of age
shall be exempt from the permit required under this
section;

(v) The department may issue permits in physical
or electronic form, or by any other method authorized by
rule of the department;

(vi) A nonmotorized recreational trail permit is
valid as follows:

HB0020

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0115
(A) An annual permit is valid from the date
of issuance through December 31 of the same calendar year;

(B) A daily permit is valid for the
calendar day specified at the time of purchase.

(d) There is created the nonmotorized recreational
trails account. Funds received from the sale or issuance of
permits under this section shall be deposited into the
account. The department may accept gifts, grants, donations
or other contributions for deposit into the account. Funds
deposited into this account are continuously appropriated
to the department of state parks and cultural resources for
the administration of the nonmotorized recreational trail
program. It is the intent of the legislature that funds in
the account shall supplement any funds appropriated to the
department of state parks and cultural resources for the
purposes and uses specified in this subsection. The funds
shall be expended only for:

(i) Maintenance, construction, signage and
enforcement of nonmotorized trails;

HB0020

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0115
(ii) Educational programs related to
nonmotorized trail use and safety;

(iii) Infrastructure supporting trail use,
including trailheads, parking areas and restrooms;

(iv) Projects located within state parks,
historic sites, recreation areas or on public trails
located within five (5) miles of a boundary that connect to
a park, site or area.

Section 2. The department of state parks and cultural
resources shall promulgate all rules necessary to implement
this act.

HB0020

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0115
Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective July 1, 2026.

(END)
HB0020